Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 203.148 is amended to read:
203.148. (1) The county governing body may establish by ordinance a fund to  be known as the
Public Land  Corner Preservation Fund. Moneys in the Public Land Corner Preservation Fund shall
be used only to pay expenses incurred and authorized by the county surveyor in  the establishment,
reestablishment and maintenance of corners of government surveys under ORS 209.070 (5) and (6).
(2) After providing  public notice of its intended action and holding a public hearing at which
the residents of the county may appear and be heard  on the issue of establishing or changing the
fee, the county governing body may establish by resolution or order a fee [ not to exceed $10 ] for
recording all instruments under ORS 205.130 (2) in addition to any other fee charged by  the county
clerk.
(3) All moneys collected under this [ subsection] section shall be  deposited with the county
treasurer at least once a month to be credited to the Public Land Corner Preservation Fund.
Enrolled House Bill 3175 (HB 3175-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House March 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 8, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3175 (HB 3175-INTRO) Page 2